Utah statutes.
17D-3-302.   Board of supervisors members to be elected -- Candidates nominated by nominating committee or petition -- Candidate qualifications.

(1)  As provided in this part, each member of a board of supervisors of a conservation district shall be elected at large within the conservation district from candidates nominated by:

(a)  a nominating committee consisting of:

(i)  the chair of the commission or council of the county in which the conservation district is located;

(ii)  the chair of the USDA Farm Service Agency Committee of the county in which the conservation district is located;

(iii) (A)  the chair of the board of supervisors of the conservation district; or

(B)  the chair's designee, if the chair wishes to be a candidate for reelection;

(iv)  the agricultural extension service designated representative of the county in which the conservation district is located; or

(b)  petition under Section 17D-3-304.

(2)  Each candidate for election to the board of supervisors of a conservation district shall be:

(a)  at least 18 years of age; and

(b)  a resident within the conservation district.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

